en: vegetable pigment, vegetable colour
fr: colorant végétal
hr: biljni pigment
it: pigmento vegetale
ja: 野菜色素

en: crayfish or shrimp
it: gambero, gamberi

en: cucumber or gherkin, cumcumber or gherkin
de: Gurke, Gurken

en: paprika or bell pepper
bg: червен пипер, паприка
cs: paprika
de: Paprika
fi: paprika
hu: paprika
lv: paprika
nb: paprika
nl: paprika, paprika's, zoete peper, snack paprika
nn: paprika
no: paprika
pl: papryka, papryki, paprykowy, paprykowe, paprykowa
sl: paprika
sv: paprika

en: vitamin and mineral blend, vitamin and mineral mix
it: vitamine e minerali misti
ru: витаминно минеральный премикс, витаминный премикс

en: French fries, fries, French fried potatoes
fr: frites, pommes de terres frites

en: carbonic acid
ar: حمض الكربوني
bg: въглеродна киселина
ca: àcid carbònic
cs: uhličná kyselina
da: kulsyre
de: Kohlensäure
el: υδροξυβωξικό οξύ
es: ácido carbónico
et: süsinikuhap
fi: hiilihappo
fr: acide carbonique
hr: uglična kiselina
hu: gázkarbonsav
it: acido carbonico
lt: anglvandeninė rūgštis
lv: oglekļu spēks
mt: tar-Riżor
nl: koolzuur
no: karbonsyre
pl: kwas węglowy
pt: ácido carbónico
ro: acid carbonat
ru: углекислая кислота
sk: uhličná kyselina
sl: ogljevicna kislina
sr: углењана киселина
sv: kolsyra
tr: karbonsyonlu asit
uk: вуглекисна кислота

en: plant-based cheese
sv: växtbaserad ost, Violife, Violife block

en: scalding and sourdough
sv: skållning och surdeg

en: caramelized apple
fr: pomme caramélisée, pommes caramélisées